Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE B. INFORMATION AND PLANNING

CHAPTER 2055. ELECTRONIC GRANT SYSTEM

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 2055.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board," "department," "electronic government project," "executive director," "local government," "major information resources project," "quality assurance team," and "state electronic Internet portal" have the meanings assigned by Section 2054.003.

(2) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003, Education Code.

(3) Repealed by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1208, Sec. 16(4), eff. September 1, 2007.

Text of subdivision effective until April 01, 2025

(4) "State agency" has the meaning assigned by Section 2054.003, except that the term does not include a university system or institution of higher education or an agency identified in Section 531.001(4).

Text of subdivision effective on April 01, 2025

(4) "State agency" has the meaning assigned by Section 2054.003, except that the term does not include a university system or institution of higher education or an agency identified in Section 521.0001(5).

(5) Repealed by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1208, Sec. 16(4), eff. September 1, 2007.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1272, Sec. 1.01, eff. June 15, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 198, Sec. 2.40, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1246, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 862 (S.B. 1002), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1208 (H.B. 1789), Sec. 16(4), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 973 (H.B. 1504), Sec. 25, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.18, eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 2055.002. APPLICABILITY TO INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION OR HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES AGENCIES.

Text of subsection effective until April 01, 2025

(a) Except as provided by Subsection (b) , the requirements of this chapter regarding electronic government projects do not apply to institutions of higher education or a health and human services agency identified in Section 531.001(4), Government Code.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the requirements of this chapter regarding electronic government projects do not apply to institutions of higher education or a health and human services agency identified in Section 521.0001(5), Government Code.

(b) Subject to approval by the office, an institution of higher education or a health and human services agency may elect to participate regarding an electronic government project of that institution or agency in the same manner as a state agency under this chapter. If the institution or health and human services agency makes this election and the office approves the election, the institution or health and human services agency:

(1) shall comply with this chapter regarding that electronic government project in the same manner as a state agency; and

(2) may not withdraw the project from management by the office unless the office approves the withdrawal.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1272, Sec. 1.01, eff. June 15, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 198, Sec. 2.41, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.19, eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 2055.003. SUNSET PROVISION. The office is subject to Chapter 325 (Texas Sunset Act). Unless continued in existence as provided by that chapter, the office is abolished September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1272, Sec. 1.01, eff. June 15, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1112, Sec. 3.03, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 928 (H.B. 3249), Sec. 3.12, eff. June 15, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER E. GRANTS ASSISTANCE PROJECT

Sec. 2055.201. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "state grant assistance" means assistance provided by a state agency that is available to a resident of this state, another state agency, a local government, or a nonprofit or faith-based organization, including a grant, contract, loan, loan guarantee, cooperative agreement, or direct appropriation, property, or another method of disbursement.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 862 (S.B. 1002), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 2055.202. ESTABLISHMENT OF PROJECT. The department shall establish an electronic government project to develop an Internet website accessible through the state electronic Internet portal that:

(1) provides a single location for state agencies to post electronic summaries of state grant assistance opportunities with the state agencies;

(2) enables a person to search for state grant assistance programs provided by state agencies;

(3) allows, when feasible, electronic submission of state grant assistance applications;

(4) improves the effectiveness and performance of state grant assistance programs;

(5) streamlines and simplifies state grant assistance application and reporting processes; and

(6) improves the delivery of services to the public.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 862 (S.B. 1002), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 973 (H.B. 1504), Sec. 26, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 2055.203. ESTABLISHING AND OPERATING PROJECT; COORDINATION. (a) In establishing and operating the electronic government project under this subchapter, the department, in coordination with the office of the governor, shall direct, coordinate, and assist state agencies in establishing and using:

(1) a common electronic application and reporting system, including:

(A) a standard format for announcing state grant assistance opportunities;

(B) standard data elements for use in creating state grant assistance opportunity announcement summaries, including existing electronic grants programs and search functions; and

(C) a common application form for a person to use in applying for state grant assistance from multiple state grant assistance programs that serve similar purposes and are administered by different state agencies; and

(2) an interagency process for:

(A) improving interagency and intergovernmental coordination of information collection and sharing of data between persons responsible for delivering services relating to a state grant assistance program; and

(B) improving the timeliness, completeness, and quality of information received by a state agency from a recipient of state grant assistance.

(b) A state agency shall provide the department and the office of the governor financial and functional information about any existing or potential systems that in any way provide the functions described in Section 2055.202.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 862 (S.B. 1002), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 2055.204. USE OF ELECTRONIC GRANT SYSTEM. (a) A state agency may not expend appropriated money to implement or design a new system that provides the functions described in Section 2055.202 without obtaining prior approval from the executive director.

(b) The executive director shall determine whether to approve a state agency's continued operation of an existing system or to integrate the system into the project created under this subchapter. The executive director may provide conditional approval of ongoing expenditures while developing appropriate project plans and funding models for the project.

(c) A state agency shall incorporate common grant application forms developed under Section 2055.203 into the agency's grant application and review processes.

(d) If the department determines that money should be consolidated in the development of this project, the department shall provide a funding model to the Legislative Budget Board and the governor as required by Section 2055.057. A state agency with an existing system approved or conditionally approved under Subsection (b) is exempt from this subsection.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 862 (S.B. 1002), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 2055.205. EXEMPT AGENCIES. (a) The executive director may exempt a state agency or state grant assistance program from the requirements of this subchapter if the executive director determines that the state agency does not have a sufficient number of state grant assistance programs.

(b) The governor, with the assistance of the department, shall make a list of exempted agencies and information about programs exempted from this subchapter available to the public through the office of the governor's Internet website.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 862 (S.B. 1002), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.